Maine, session 132, LD1597.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1110-A is enacted to read:
§1110-A. Dynamic pricing prohibition
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Dynamic pricing" means the practice of causing a price for a good or a product to
fluctuate based upon demand, the weather, consumer data or other similar factors
including an artificial intelligence-enabled pricing adjustment. "Dynamic pricing" does
not include a price that deviates from a standard price for a reason other than demand,
the weather, consumer data or other similar factors including an artificial intelligence-
enabled pricing adjustment and also does not include:
(1) A discount;
(2) A special price set for a limited period of time, such as a lunch menu, early bird
or happy hour price; or
(3) A market price for a good or product that traditionally has been priced based
upon market conditions, such as seafood, except that a market price may only be
set once in a business day.
B. "Eating establishment" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 2491, subsection
7.
C. "Grocery store" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 2491, subsection 7-B.
2. Prohibition on dynamic pricing. An eating establishment or grocery store may not
use dynamic pricing in setting the price for a good or product sold by the eating
establishment or grocery store. The price for a good or product must remain fixed for at
least one business day and must be posted or displayed in a manner visible to the public,
such as on a menu, menu board, price tag or label.
3. Unfair trade practice. A violation of this section is an unfair trade practice under
the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act.